Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.360

Medical, surgical or hospital treatment.

If, in addition to monetary assistance, benefits or other temporary or permanent relief, the United States or any agent thereof furnishes medical, surgical or hospital treatment or any combination thereof to an injured emergency worker, then the emergency worker has no right to receive similar medical, surgical or hospital treatment as provided in this chapter. However, the department may furnish medical, surgical or hospital treatment as part of the compensation provided under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1986 c 266 s 40; 1984 c 38 s 37; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 38; 1953 c 223 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.